Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-236
Application for water power; lease from state required; fee; renewal; cancellation; grounds.

An application for appropriation of water for water power shall meet the requirements of section 46-234 and subsection (1) of section 46-235 to be approved. Within six months after the approval of an application for water power and before placing water to any beneficial use, the applicant shall enter into a contract with the State of Nebraska, through the Chief Water Officer, for leasing the use of all water so appropriated. Such lease shall be upon forms prepared by the Chief Water Officer, and the time of such lease shall not run for a greater period than fifty years; and for the use of water for power purposes the applicant shall pay into the state treasury on or before January 1 each year fifteen dollars for each one hundred horsepower for all water so appropriated. Upon application of the lessee or its assigns, the Chief Water Officer shall renew the lease so as to continue it and the water appropriation in full force and effect for an additional period of fifty years.

Upon the failure of the applicant to comply with any of the provisions of such lease and the failure to pay any of such fees, the Chief Water Officer shall notify the lessee that the required fees have not been paid to the Chief Water Officer or that the lessee is not otherwise in compliance with the provisions of the lease. If the lessee has not come into compliance with all provisions of the lease or has not paid to the Chief Water Officer all required fees within fifteen calendar days after the date of such notice, the Chief Water Officer shall issue an order denying the applicant the right to divert or otherwise use the water appropriation for power production. The Chief Water Officer shall rescind the order denying use of the water appropriation at such time as the lessee has come into compliance with all provisions of the lease and has paid all required fees to the Chief Water Officer. If after forty-five calendar days from the date of issuance of the order the lessee is not in compliance with all provisions of the lease or required fees have not been paid to the Chief Water Officer, such lease and water appropriation shall be canceled by the Chief Water Officer.

Laws 1921, c. 291, § 1, p. 942;

C.S.1922, § 8437;

C.S.1929, § 81-6318;

R.S.1943, § 46-236;

Laws 1972, LB 1306, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 140, § 7;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 111;

Laws 2011, LB27, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 93.

State may lease use of public waters for power purposes. Hickman v. Loup River P. P. Dist., 176 Neb. 416, 126 N.W.2d 404 (1964).

Applicant for use of water for power purposes may make lease with state. Hickman v. Loup River P. P. Dist., 173 Neb. 428, 113 N.W.2d 617 (1962).